California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) Every pharmacy shall have written policies and procedures for addressing chemical, mental, or physical impairment, as well as theft, diversion, or self-use of dangerous drugs, among licensed individuals employed by or with the pharmacy.

(c) Every pharmacy shall report and provide to the board, within 14 days of the receipt or development thereof, the following information with regard to any licensed individual employed by or with the pharmacy:

(1) Any admission by a licensed individual of chemical, mental, or physical impairment affecting his or her ability to practice.

(2) Any admission by a licensed individual of theft, diversion, or self-use of dangerous drugs.

(3) Any video or documentary evidence demonstrating chemical, mental, or physical impairment of a licensed individual to the extent it affects his or her ability to practice.

(4) Any video or documentary evidence demonstrating theft, diversion, or self-use of
 dangerous drugs by a licensed individual.

(5) Any termination based on chemical, mental, or physical impairment of a licensed individual to the extent it affects his or her ability to practice.

(6) Any termination of a licensed individual based on theft, diversion, or self-use of dangerous drugs.

(d) The report required in subdivision (c) shall include sufficient detail to inform the board of the facts upon which the report is based, including an estimate of the type and quantity of all dangerous drugs involved, the timeframe over which the losses are suspected, and the date of the last controlled substances inventory. Upon request of the board, the pharmacy shall prepare and submit an audit involving the dangerous drugs suspected to be missing.

(e) Anyone making a report authorized or required by this section shall have immunity from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise arise from the making of the report. Any participant shall have the same immunity with respect to participation in any administrative or judicial proceeding resulting from the report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 646, Sec. 1.   (SB 431)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4105.

(a) All records or other documentation required to be maintained pursuant to this chapter by any entity licensed by the board shall be retained on the licensed premises in a readily retrievable form.

(b) The licensee may remove the original records or documentation from the licensed premises on a temporary basis for license-related purposes. However, a duplicate set of those records or other documentation shall be retained on the licensed premises.

(c) The records required by this
 chapter shall be retained on the licensed premises for a period of three years from the date of making. Paper records may be converted into a digital format and maintained only in a noneditable format. Certification that the digitized documents have not been altered may be required by the board.

(d) (1) Any records that are maintained electronically shall be maintained so that the pharmacist-in-charge, or the pharmacist on duty if the pharmacist-in-charge is not on duty, shall, at all times during which the licensed premises are open for business, be able to produce a hardcopy, digitized copy, or electronic copy of all records required by this chapter to be maintained electronically.

(2) In the case of a veterinary
 food-animal drug retailer, wholesaler, or third-party logistics provider, any records that are maintained electronically shall be maintained so that the designated representative-in-charge or the responsible manager, or the designated representative on duty or the designated representative-3PL on duty if the designated representative-in-charge or responsible manager is not on duty, shall, at all times during which the licensed place of business is open for business, be able to produce a hardcopy, digitized copy, or electronic copy of all records of acquisition or disposition or other drug or dispensing-related records maintained electronically.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), the board may, upon written request, grant to a licensee a waiver of the requirements that the records described in
 subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) be kept on the licensed premises.

(2) A waiver granted pursuant to this subdivision shall not affect the board’s authority under this section or any other provision of this chapter.

(f) When requested by an authorized officer of the law or by an authorized representative of the board, the owner, corporate officer, or manager of an entity licensed by the board shall provide the board with the requested records within three business days of the time the request was made. The entity may request in writing an extension of this timeframe for a period not to exceed 14 calendar days from the date the records were requested. A request for an extension of time is subject to the approval of the board. An extension shall be deemed approved if the board fails
 to deny the extension request within two business days of the time the extension request was made directly to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 29.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4106.

For purposes of license verification, a person may rely upon the licensing information as it is displayed on the board’s Internet Web site that includes the issuance and expiration dates of any license issued by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4107.

(a) The board shall not issue more than one site license to a single premises except as follows:

(1) To issue a veterinary food-animal drug retailer license to a wholesaler pursuant to Section 4196.

(2) To issue a license to compound sterile drugs to a pharmacy pursuant to Section 4127.1 or 4127.2.

(3) To issue a centralized hospital packaging license pursuant to Section 4128.

(4) To issue licenses to two independently owned clinics that share a clinic office space pursuant to Section 4180.5.

(b) For the purposes of this subdivision, “premises” means a location with its own address and an independent means of ingress and egress.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 548, Sec. 6.   (AB 401)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4107.5.

If a manufacturer, wholesaler, third-party logistics provider, or pharmacy has reasonable cause to believe that a dangerous drug or dangerous device in, or having been in, its possession is counterfeit or the subject of a fraudulent transaction, the manufacturer, wholesaler, third-party logistics provider, or pharmacy shall notify the board within 72 hours of obtaining that knowledge. This section shall apply to any dangerous drug or dangerous device that has been sold or distributed in or through this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 507, Sec. 13.   (AB 2605)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Pharmacies [4110. - 4126.10.]

4110.

(a) No person shall conduct a pharmacy in the State of California unless they have obtained a license from the board. A license shall be required for each pharmacy owned or operated by a specific person. A separate license shall be required for each of the premises of any person operating a pharmacy in more than one location. The license shall be renewed annually. The license shall not be renewed unless the applicant includes necessary matters identified by the board in the renewal application, including, but not limited to, notification to the board regarding compounding practices, including compounded human drug preparations distributed outside of the state. The board may, by regulation, determine the circumstances under which a license may be transferred.

(b) The
 board may, at its discretion, issue a temporary permit upon the conditions and for any periods of time as the board determines to be in the public interest. A temporary permit fee shall be required in an amount established by the board as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 4400. When needed to protect public safety, a temporary permit may be issued for a period not to exceed 180 days, and may be issued subject to terms and conditions the board deems necessary. If the board determines a temporary permit was issued by mistake or denies the application for a permanent license or registration, the temporary license or registration shall terminate upon either personal service of the notice of termination upon the permitholder or service by certified mail, return receipt requested, at the permitholder’s address of record with the board, whichever comes first. Neither for purposes of retaining a temporary permit nor for purposes of any disciplinary or license denial proceeding before the board shall the
 temporary permitholder be deemed to have a vested property right or interest in the permit.

(c) The board may allow the temporary use of a mobile pharmacy when a pharmacy is destroyed or damaged, the mobile pharmacy is necessary to protect the health and safety of the public, and the following conditions are met:

(1) The mobile pharmacy shall provide services only on or immediately contiguous to the site of the damaged or destroyed pharmacy.

(2) The mobile pharmacy is under the control and management of the pharmacist-in-charge of the pharmacy that was destroyed or damaged.

(3) A licensed pharmacist is on the premises while drugs are being dispensed.

(4) Reasonable security measures are
 taken to safeguard the drug supply maintained in the mobile pharmacy.

(5) The pharmacy operating the mobile pharmacy provides the board with records of the destruction of, or damage to, the pharmacy and an expected restoration date.

(6) Within three calendar days of restoration of the pharmacy services, the board is provided with notice of the restoration of the permanent pharmacy.

(7) The mobile pharmacy is not operated for more than 48 hours following the restoration of the permanent pharmacy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 629, Sec. 16.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4110.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a county, city and county, or special hospital authority described in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 101850) or Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 101852) of Part 4 of Division 101 of the Health and Safety Code may operate one or more mobile units to provide prescription medication within its jurisdiction to those individuals without fixed addresses, individuals living in county-owned or city-and-county-owned or operated housing facilities, and those enrolled in Medi-Cal plans operated by the county or a city and county, a health district, or a joint powers authority pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The mobile unit shall be operated as an extension of a pharmacy
 license held by the county, city and county, or special hospital authority. The pharmacist-in-charge shall determine the number of mobile units that are appropriate for a particular pharmacy license. The mobile unit may dispense prescription medication pursuant to a valid prescription, including a prescription of a physician who practices in the mobile unit, if the county, city and county, or special hospital authority meets all of the following requirements:

(a) A licensed pharmacist is on the premises and the mobile unit is under the control and management of a pharmacist while prescription medications are being dispensed.

(b) All activities of the pharmacist, including the furnishing of medication by the pharmacist, are consistent with Article 3 (commencing with Section 4050).

(c) If a physician is practicing in
 the mobile unit, all prescribing by the physician meets the requirements of the Medical Practice Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000)).

(d) (1) The mobile unit does not carry or dispense controlled substances.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to Schedule III, Schedule IV, or Schedule V controlled substances approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of opioid use disorder. Any controlled substance for the treatment of opioid use disorder carried or dispensed in accordance with this paragraph shall be carried in reasonable quantities based on prescription volume and stored securely in the mobile pharmacy unit.

(e) Dangerous drugs shall not be left in the mobile unit during the hours that the mobile unit is not in operation.

(f) A county, city and county, or special hospital authority shall notify the board of its intention to operate a mobile unit as soon as possible, and no later than five business days after commencing operation of a mobile unit. A county, city and county, or special hospital authority shall also notify the board of its intention to discontinue operation of a mobile unit as soon as possible, and at least one business day before discontinuing operation of a mobile unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 539, Sec. 1.   (AB 663)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4111.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), or in subdivision (b), (d), or (e), the board shall not issue or renew a license to conduct a pharmacy to any of the following:

(1) A person or persons authorized to prescribe or write a prescription, as specified in Section 4040, in the State of California.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), a person or persons with whom a person or persons specified in paragraph (1) shares a community or other financial interest in the license sought.

(B) Subparagraph (A) shall not preclude the issuance of a new or
 renewal license to conduct a pharmacy if both of the following conditions are met:

(i) Both the person or persons specified in paragraph (1) and the person seeking the license provide statements that the person or persons specified in paragraph (1) disavow any community or financial interest in the license.

(ii) Any interest in the license that is shared community property, as defined in Section 65 of the Family Code, of a person specified in paragraph (1) and the person seeking the license is transmuted into the separate property of the person seeking the license.

(C) A pharmacy that is granted a license pursuant to the exception in subparagraph (B) shall not fill any prescriptions, emergency or otherwise, issued or
 prescribed by either of the following persons:

(i) A person specified in paragraph (1) who shares a community or other financial interest with the licensee.

(ii) A prescriber at the same place of business as a person specified in clause (i) if the prescriber owns an interest greater than 10 percent in the practice issuing the prescription.

(3) Any corporation that is controlled by, or in which 10 percent or more of the stock is owned by a person or persons prohibited from pharmacy ownership by paragraph (1) or (2).

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not preclude the issuance of a permit for an inpatient hospital pharmacy to the owner of the hospital in which it is
 located.

(c) The board may require any information the board deems is reasonably necessary for the enforcement of this section.

(d) Subdivision (a) shall not preclude the issuance of a new or renewal license for a pharmacy to be owned or owned and operated by a person licensed on or before August 1, 1981, under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) and qualified on or before August 1, 1981, under subsection (d) of Section 1310 of Title XIII of the federal Public Health Service Act, as amended, whose ownership includes persons defined pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(e) (1) Subdivision (a) shall not preclude the issuance of a new or renewal license for a pharmacy to be owned or owned and operated by a pharmacist.

(2) If the board issues a license pursuant to paragraph (1), the pharmacist owning or owning and operating the pharmacy shall do both of the following when issuing a drug order pursuant to Section 4052, 4052.1, 4052.2, or 4052.6:

(A) Offer to provide a prescription to the patient that the patient may elect to have filled by a pharmacy of the patient’s choice unless prohibited by the collaborative practice agreement.

(B) Provide a full patient consultation before issuing the drug order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 30.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4112.

(a) Any pharmacy located outside this state that is involved in the preparation, dispensing, shipping, mailing, or delivery, in any manner, of controlled substances, dangerous drugs, or dangerous devices into this state shall be considered a nonresident pharmacy.

(b) A person shall not act as a nonresident pharmacy unless the person has obtained a license from the board. The board may register a nonresident pharmacy that is organized as a limited liability company in the state in which it is licensed.

(c) A nonresident pharmacy shall disclose to the board the location, names, and titles of (1) its agent for
 service of process in this state, (2) all principal corporate officers, if any, (3) all general partners, if any, and (4) all pharmacists who are dispensing controlled substances, dangerous drugs, or dangerous devices to residents of this state. The report shall be made on an annual basis and within 30 days after any change of office, corporate officer, partner, or pharmacist.

(d) All nonresident pharmacies shall comply with all lawful directions and requests for information from the regulatory or licensing agency of the state in which it is licensed as well as with all requests for information made by the board pursuant to this section. The nonresident pharmacy shall maintain, at all times, a valid unexpired license, permit, or registration to conduct the pharmacy in compliance with the laws of the state in which it is a resident.
 As a prerequisite to registering with the board and ongoing licensure, the nonresident pharmacy shall identify a California-licensed pharmacist employed and working at the nonresident pharmacy to be proposed to serve as the pharmacist-in-charge, and submit a copy of the most recent inspection report resulting from an inspection conducted by the regulatory or licensing agency of the state in which it is located.

(e) All nonresident pharmacies shall maintain records of controlled substances, dangerous drugs, or dangerous devices dispensed to patients in this state so that the records are readily retrievable from the records of other drugs dispensed.

(f) Any pharmacy subject to this section shall, during its regular hours of operation, but not less than six days per week, and for a minimum
 of 40 hours per week, provide a toll-free telephone service to facilitate communication between patients in this state and a pharmacist at the pharmacy who has access to the patient’s records. This toll-free telephone number shall be disclosed on a label affixed to each container of drugs dispensed to patients in this state.

(g) A nonresident pharmacy shall not permit a pharmacist to manufacture, compound, furnish, sell, dispense, or initiate the prescription of a dangerous drug or dangerous device, or to provide any pharmacy-related service, to California patients under either of the following conditions:

(1) The pharmacist’s license has been revoked by the jurisdiction and has not been subsequently reinstated.

(2) The pharmacist-in-charge of the pharmacy is not licensed in California.

(h) The board shall adopt regulations that apply the same requirements or standards for oral consultation to a nonresident
 pharmacy that operates pursuant to this section and ships, mails, or delivers any controlled substances, dangerous drugs, or dangerous devices to residents of this state, as are applied to an in-state pharmacy that operates pursuant to Section 4037 when the pharmacy ships, mails, or delivers any controlled substances, dangerous drugs, or dangerous devices to residents of this state. The board shall not adopt any regulations that require face-to-face consultation for a prescription that is shipped, mailed, or delivered to the patient. The regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall not result in any unnecessary delay in patients receiving their medication.

(i) The registration fee shall be the fee specified in subdivision (a) of Section 4400.

(j) The registration requirements of this section shall apply only to a nonresident pharmacy that ships, mails, or delivers controlled substances, dangerous drugs, and dangerous devices into this state pursuant to a prescription.

(k) The board may inspect a nonresident pharmacy licensed pursuant to this section. In addition to paying the fees established in Section 4400, the nonresident pharmacy shall deposit, when notified by the board, a reasonable amount, as determined by the board, necessary to cover the board’s estimated reasonable costs of performing the inspection. If the required deposit is not received or if the actual costs of the inspection exceed the amount deposited, the board shall issue an invoice for the remaining amount and shall not take action on the renewal application until the full amount has been paid
 to the board. If the amount deposited exceeds the amount of actual and necessary costs incurred, the board shall remit the difference to the applicant.

(l) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the dispensing of contact lenses by nonresident pharmacists except as provided by Section 4124.

(m) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 31) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 32.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4113.

(a) (1) Every pharmacy shall designate a pharmacist-in-charge.

(2) A pharmacy licensed pursuant to Section 4110 shall, within
 30 days of the designation in paragraph (1), notify the board in writing of the identity and license number of that pharmacist and the date they were designated.

(3) A pharmacy licensed pursuant to Section 4112 shall, within 90 days of the designation in paragraph (1), notify the board in writing of the identify and license number of that pharmacist and the date they were designated.

(b) The proposed pharmacist-in-charge shall be subject to approval by the board. The board shall not issue or renew a pharmacy license without identification of an approved pharmacist-in-charge for the pharmacy.

(c) (1) The pharmacist-in-charge shall be responsible for a pharmacy’s compliance with all
 state and federal laws and regulations pertaining to the practice of pharmacy.

(2) The pharmacist-in-charge shall make staffing decisions to ensure sufficient personnel are present in the pharmacy to prevent fatigue, distraction, or other conditions that may interfere with a pharmacist’s ability to practice competently and safely. If the pharmacist-in-charge is not available, a pharmacist on duty may adjust staffing according to workload if needed. This paragraph does not apply to facilities of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(3) The determination of the appropriate pharmacist-to-technician ratio shall be made by the pharmacist-in-charge, provided that the ratio does not exceed the maximum ratio established in subdivision (g) of Section 4115. No other
 person, permittee, or licensee shall interfere with the exercise of the pharmacist-in-charge’s independent professional judgment in setting the pharmacist-to-technician ratio.

(d) (1) The pharmacist-in-charge or pharmacist on duty shall immediately notify store management or the building owner or a similar entity of any conditions that present an immediate risk of death, illness, or irreparable harm to patients, personnel, or pharmacy staff. Store management shall take immediate and reasonable steps to address and resolve the conditions that present an immediate risk of death, illness, or irreparable harm to patients, personnel, or pharmacy staff. If the conditions are not resolved within 24 hours, the pharmacist-in-charge or pharmacist on duty shall ensure the board is timely notified.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as presenting, limiting, or restraining a pharmacist-in-charge, pharmacy technician, or member of the public from communication with the board, including filing a complaint.

(3) The conditions that present an immediate risk of death, illness, or irreparable harm to patients, personnel, or pharmacy staff may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Workplace safety and health hazards that present an immediate risk of death, illness, or irreparable harm to patients, personnel, or pharmacy staff.

(B) Sustained temperatures that could impact ambient temperature drug stability according to manufacturer
 data on acceptable drug storage conditions.

(C) Vermin infestation that poses a risk to the safety or efficacy of medicine.

(4) If, after receipt of a notice described in paragraph (1) and an evaluation and assessment of the relevant evidence, the executive officer has a reasonable belief that conditions within a pharmacy exist that present an immediate risk of death, illness, or irreparable harm to patients, personnel, or pharmacy staff, the executive officer may, in conformance with the processes set forth in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 4127.3, issue an order to the pharmacy to immediately cease and desist those pharmacy operations that are affected by the conditions at issue. The cease and desist order shall remain in effect until either the executive officer
 determines the conditions that presented an immediate risk of death, illness, or irreparable harm to patients, personnel, or pharmacy staff have been abated or for no more than 30 days, whichever is earlier. Evidence of corrective actions taken shall be submitted by the pharmacy to correct the conditions at issue. Failure to comply with a cease and desist order issued pursuant to this section shall be unprofessional conduct pursuant to Section 4156.

(5) Nothing in this paragraph shall prevent the owner of the licensed premises from closing a pharmacy to mitigate against a perceived immediate risk of death, illness, or irreparable harm to patients, personnel, or pharmacy staff.

(6) Facilities of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall be exempt from this
 subdivision.

(e) (1) Every pharmacy licensed pursuant to Section 4110 shall notify the board in writing, on a form designed by the board, within 30 days of the date when a pharmacist-in-charge ceases to act as the pharmacist-in-charge, and shall on the same form propose another pharmacist to take over as the pharmacist-in-charge.

(2) Every pharmacy licensed pursuant to Section 4112 shall notify the board in writing, on a form designed by the board, within 90 days of the date when a pharmacist-in-charge ceases to act as the pharmacist-in-charge, and shall on the same form propose another pharmacist to take over as the pharmacist-in-charge.

(3) The proposed replacement pharmacist-in-charge shall be subject
 to approval by the board. If disapproved, the pharmacy shall propose another replacement within 15 days of the date of disapproval and shall continue to name proposed replacements until a pharmacist-in-charge is approved by the board.

(f) If a pharmacy is unable, in the exercise of reasonable diligence, to identify within 30 days a permanent replacement pharmacist-in-charge to propose to the board on the notification form, the pharmacy may instead provide on that form the name of any pharmacist who is an employee, officer, or administrator of the pharmacy or the entity that owns the pharmacy and who is actively involved in the management of the pharmacy on a daily basis, to act as the interim pharmacist-in-charge for a period not to exceed 120 days. The pharmacy, or the entity that owns the pharmacy, shall be prepared during normal business
 hours to provide a representative of the board with the name of the interim pharmacist-in-charge with documentation of the active involvement of the interim pharmacist-in-charge in the daily management of the pharmacy, and with documentation of the pharmacy’s good faith efforts prior to naming the interim pharmacist-in-charge to obtain a permanent pharmacist-in-charge. By no later than 120 days following the identification of the interim pharmacist-in-charge, the pharmacy shall propose to the board the name of a pharmacist to serve as the permanent pharmacist-in-charge. The proposed permanent pharmacist-in-charge shall be subject to approval by the board. If disapproved, the pharmacy shall propose another replacement within 15 days of the date of disapproval, and shall continue to name proposed replacements until a pharmacist-in-charge is approved by the
 board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 33.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4113.1.

(a) Except as specified in subdivision (e), a community pharmacy licensed pursuant to this article shall report, either directly or through a designated third party, including a component patient safety organization as defined in Section 3.20 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, all medication errors to an entity approved by the board. A community pharmacy shall submit the report no later than 14 days following the date of discovery of the error. These reports are deemed confidential and are not subject to discovery, subpoena, or disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), except that the board may publish deidentified case summary
 information compiled from the data in the reports so long as deidentification is done in accordance with the requirements set forth in Section 164.514(b)(2) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and includes omitting the name of the reporting pharmacy. The community pharmacy shall maintain records demonstrating compliance with this requirement for three years and shall make these records immediately available at the request of an inspector. A medication error report made pursuant to this section shall not be subject to investigation, discipline, or other enforcement action by the board based solely on a report received pursuant to this section. However, if the board receives other information regarding the medication error independent of the medication error report, that information may serve as basis for discipline or other enforcement by the board.

(b) Any entity approved by the board shall have experience with the analysis of medication errors that occur in the outpatient setting.

(c) For purposes of this section, “community pharmacy” includes any pharmacy that dispenses medication to an outpatient, but does not include facilities of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(d) For purposes of this section, “medication error” includes any variation from a prescription drug order not authorized by the prescriber, including, but not limited to, errors involving the wrong drug, the wrong dose, the wrong patient, the wrong directions, the wrong preparation, or the wrong route of administration. A medication error does not include any variation that is corrected prior
 to dispensing to the patient or patient’s agent or any variation allowed by law.

(e) An outpatient hospital pharmacy shall not be required to report a medication error that meets the requirements of an adverse event, as specified in subdivision (a), that has been reported to the State Department of Public Health pursuant to Section 1279.1 of the Health and Safety Code. The State Department of Public Health may share a report with the California State Board of Pharmacy.

(f) A pharmacy licensed pursuant to Section 4112 shall only be required to report medication errors related to prescriptions dispensed to California residents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 34.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4113.5.

(a) A community pharmacy shall not require a pharmacist employee to engage in the practice of pharmacy at any time the pharmacy is open to the public, unless either another employee of the pharmacy or, if the pharmacy is located within another establishment, an employee of the establishment within which the pharmacy is located, is made available to assist the pharmacist at all times.

(b) This section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) A hospital pharmacy, as defined in Section 4029 or 4056.

(2) A pharmacy located in a hospital
 facility, including, but not limited to, a building where outpatient services are provided in accordance with the hospital’s license. 

(3) A pharmacy owned or operated by a federal, state, local, or tribal government entity, including, but not limited to, a correctional pharmacy, a University of California pharmacy, or a pharmacy operated by the State Department of State Hospitals.

(4) A pharmacy owned by a person or persons who, collectively, control the majority of the beneficial interest in no more than four pharmacies in California.

(5) A pharmacy entirely owned and operated by a health care service plan that exclusively contracts with no more than two medical groups in the state to provide, or arrange for the provision of, professional medical services to the enrollees of the plan.

(6) A pharmacy that permits patients to receive
 medications at a drive-through window when both of the following conditions are met:

(A) A pharmacist is working during the times when patients may receive medication only at the drive-through window.

(B) The pharmacist’s employer does not require the pharmacist to retrieve items for sale to patients if the items are located outside the pharmacy. These items include, but are not limited to, items for which a prescription is not required.

(7) Any other pharmacy from which controlled substances, dangerous drugs, or dangerous devices are not furnished, sold, or dispensed at retail.

(c) A violation of subdivision (a) is not subject to subdivision (a)
 of Section 4321.

(d) The board shall not take action against a pharmacy for a violation of this section if both of the following apply:

(1) Another employee is unavailable to assist the pharmacist due to reasonably unanticipated circumstances, including, but not limited to, illness, injury, family emergency, or the employee’s termination or resignation.

(2) The pharmacy takes all reasonable action to make another employee available to assist the pharmacist.

(e) This section shall not be construed to permit an employee who is not licensed under this chapter to engage in any act for which a license is required under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 569, Sec. 2.   (SB 1442)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4113.6.

(a) A chain community pharmacy subject to Section 4113.5 shall be staffed at all times with at least one clerk or pharmacy technician fully dedicated to performing pharmacy-related services. The board shall not take action against a pharmacy for a violation of this subdivision if any of the following conditions apply:

(1) The pharmacist on duty waives the requirement in writing during specified hours based on workload need.

(2) The pharmacy is open beyond normal business hours, which is before 8:00 a.m. and after 7:00 p.m. During the hours before 8:00 a.m. and after 7:00 p.m., the requirement shall not apply.

(3) The pharmacy’s prescription volume per day on average is less than 75 prescriptions per day based on the average daily prescription volume for the past calendar year. However, if the pharmacist is also expected to provide additional pharmacy services such as immunizations, tests classified as waived under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 263a), or any other ancillary services provided by law, this paragraph does not apply.

(b) Where staffing of pharmacist hours within a chain community pharmacy does not overlap sufficiently, scheduled closures for lunch time for all pharmacy staff shall be established and publicly posted and included on the outgoing telephone message.

(c) A chain community pharmacy shall post, in a prominent place for pharmacy personnel, a notice that provides information on how to file a complaint with the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 35.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4113.7.

(a) A chain community pharmacy, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 4001, shall not establish a quota related to the duties for which a pharmacist or pharmacy technician license is required.

(b) A chain community pharmacy shall not, through employees, contractors, or third parties, communicate the existence of
 quotas, that are illegal pursuant to this section, to pharmacists or pharmacy technicians who are employees of the chain community pharmacy or with whom the chain community pharmacy contracts.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, “quota” means a fixed number or formula related to the duties for which a pharmacist or pharmacy technician license is required, against which the chain 
 community pharmacy or its agent measures or evaluates the number of times either an individual pharmacist or pharmacy technician performs tasks or provides services while on duty. “Quota” includes a fixed number or formula related to any of the following:

(A) Prescriptions filled.

(B) Services rendered to patients.

(C) Programs offered to patients.

(D) Revenue obtained.

(2) For purposes of this section, “quota” does not mean any of the following:

(A) A measurement of the revenue earned by a particular licensed chain community pharmacy not calculated in relation to, or measured by, the tasks performed, or services provided by, individual pharmacists or pharmacy technicians.

(B) Any evaluation or measurement of the competence, performance, or quality of care provided to patients of a pharmacist or pharmacy technician if the evaluation does not use quotas, as defined in paragraph (1).

(C) Any performance metric required by state or federal regulators that does not use quotas, as defined in paragraph (1).

(d) This section does not prohibit a chain community pharmacy from establishing policies and procedures that assist in assessing the competency and performance of a pharmacist or pharmacy technician in providing care to patients if the measurements used are not, or do not include, quotas, as defined in subdivision (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 334, Sec. 2.   (SB 362)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4114.

(a) An intern pharmacist may perform all functions of a pharmacist at the discretion of and under the direct supervision and control of a pharmacist whose license is in good standing with the board.

(b) A pharmacist may not supervise more than two intern pharmacists at any one time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4115.
